Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3060.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.40, is amended to read: 216B.40 EXCLUSIVE SERVICE RIGHT; SERVICE EXTENSION. new text begin (a) new text end Except as provided in new text begin paragraph (b) and new text end sections 216B.42 and 216B.421, each electric utility shall have the exclusive right to provide electric service at retail to each and every present and future customer in its assigned service area and no electric utility shall render or extend electric service at retail within the assigned service area of another electric utility unless the electric utility consents thereto in writing; provided that any electric utility may extend its facilities through the assigned service area of another electric utility if the extension is necessary to facilitate the electric utility connecting its facilities or customers within its own assigned service area. new text begin (b) Notwithstanding any other law, an electric utility must not prohibit or prevent a Minnesota Tribal government, as defined in section 10.65, from installing an electric generation facility or device to provide electricity to a building owned and operated by the Minnesota Tribal government. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end